Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6057.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section I of Chapter 80 of the Public Laws of 1965, entitled "An Act
Approving and Ratifying the Agreement between the Towns of Exeter and West Greenwich, Rhode
Island, with Respect to the formation of a Regional School District," and the several amendments
to the same subsequent thereto, is hereby amended to read as follows:
(H) Compensation.
Compensation for members of the committee and the clerk and treasurer thereof, shall be
determined by the voters at the regional school district financial meeting all day referendum.
SECTION 2. Section II of Chapter 80 of the Public Laws of 1965, entitled "An Act
Approving and Ratifying the Agreement between the Towns of Exeter and West Greenwich, Rhode
Island, with Respect to the formation of a Regional School District," and the several amendments
to the same subsequent thereto, are hereby amended to read as follows:
(A) Composition.
The regional district school building committee shall consist of twelve (12) eight (8)
members, six (6) four (4) from the town of Exeter and six (6) four (4) from the town of West
Greenwich.
(B) Method of selection.
Six (6) Two (2) of the members of the regional district school committee (one member
from Exeter and one member from West Greenwich) shall be members ex officii of the school
building committee to be selected by the school committee. In addition, the town council of each

member town shall appoint three (3) one town council member and two (2) residents of the town
to serve as members of the regional district school building committee.
(C) Method of organization.
At such time as the regional district school building committee shall be deemed necessary,
the chairman chairperson of the regional district school committee (or chairperson's designee) shall
call upon the respective town councils of the member towns for the appointment of the necessary
representatives. The chairman chairperson (or chairperson's designee) of the regional district school
committee shall then notify those persons appointed or elected of the time and place of the first
meeting, and shall act as the temporary chairman, without voting rights, until at which time the
regional district school building committee shall have completed complete its own organization,
including the selection of a chairperson.
(D) Powers and duties.
The regional district school building committee shall have the following duties:
(1) To secure competent architectural and engineering services for the making of surveys,
the preparation of plans and specifications for the construction, and equipment and improvement
of a school or schools, athletic facilities, and/or the grounds upon which the schools are located in
said district, and to employ such clerical assistance as may be necessary.
(2) To construct, furnish and equip schools and athletic facilities and improve the grounds
upon which the schools are located and to make additions to said schools as may be needed.
To make all contracts and agreements that may be necessary for the exercise of the powers
vested in said district school building committee by subparagraphs subparagraph (1) and (2) hereof,
provided, however, that said regional district school building committee shall not make any
expenditure or incur any liability unless the necessary appropriations have been authorized by the
regional school district financial meeting as hereinafter provided in one or more of the following
ways:
(i) Authorization of a capital improvements bond after approval of the regional district
school committee, the town council of each member town, the Rhode Island department of
education, and the affirmative vote of the community through the approved election process;
(ii) Authorization of capital improvements through a capital improvements line separate
from the annual school district operating budget after approval of the regional district school
committee and the affirmative vote of the community through the approved election process; and
(iii) Authorization of capital improvements through a vote of the regional district school
committee to commit funds from the unassigned fund balance for the purpose of an identified
capital project(s).
LC002395 - Page 2 of 6

(3) All actions of the district school building committee shall be reported back to the
regional district school committee at its next regularly scheduled meeting.
(E) Term.
The term of the building committee shall be until such time as the authorized building or
buildings have been constructed projects have been completed and have been accepted by the
regional district school building committee upon recommendation of the architects, commissioning
agents, and/or owner's project manager (OPM) engaged by the regional district school building
committee and for up to one year thereafter, whereupon the term of office of the committee shall
terminate.
(F) Vacancies.
In the event of a vacancy on the school building committee, the town council from the
member town involved shall appoint a member to serve the balance of the term, provided, however,
that any vacancy among members of the regional school district committee serving ex officii shall
be filled in accordance with subsection I (D)(B).
(G) Limitation of liability.
No member of the regional district school building committee shall be held personally
liable for damages in the performance of his/her duties as a member of the committee.
SECTION 3. Section VI of Chapter 80 of the Public Laws of 1965, entitled "An Act
Approving and Ratifying the Agreement between the Towns of Exeter and West Greenwich, Rhode
Island, with Respect to the formation of a Regional School District," and the several amendments
to the same subsequent thereto, are hereby amended to read as follows:
(D) Apportionment of construction and operating costs.
Construction and operating costs for the first fiscal year next following the establishment
of the regional school district and for every fiscal year thereafter shall be apportioned to the member
towns on the basis of their respective pupil enrollments in the regional school system. Beginning
with the 2023 fiscal year, apportionment shall be calculated using a phased-in five (5) year rolling
enrollment average. Each member town's share of construction and operating costs for each the
2023 fiscal year shall be determined by computing the ratio which the town's pupil enrollment in
the regional district schools on October 1 of the year next preceding the year for which the
apportionment is determined bears to the total pupil enrollment from all the member towns in the
regional district schools on the same date. In each successive year, the annual ratio shall be
computed in a similar manner, but the apportionment shall be calculated as the average enrollment
of fiscal years 2023 and 2024 for fiscal year 2024; as the average enrollment of fiscal years 2023,
2024 and 2025 for fiscal year 2025; as the average enrollment of fiscal years 2023, 2024, 2025 and
LC002395 - Page 3 of 6

2026 for fiscal year 2026; and as the average enrollment of fiscal years 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026 and
2027 for fiscal year 2027. In each successive year thereafter, the apportionment shall be calculated
as the average enrollment of the previous five (5) consecutive fiscal years, effectively adding the
newest annual enrollment data and dropping the earliest annual enrollment data from the calculation
of the average. Calculation of the average to determine the apportionment ratio for each member
town in any given fiscal year shall be by adding the total enrollment numbers of said town for each
of the fiscal years included in the calculation of the average, and dividing that sum by the sum of
the total district enrollment for each of the fiscal years included in the calculation of the average.
In the event that enrollment in the regional district schools has not been accomplished by October
1 of any such year, construction and operating costs shall be apportioned on the basis of the
enrollment of pupils residing in each member town and receiving education at such town's expense
on October 1 of such year shall be used in the formula to calculate the apportionment.
SECTION 4. Section XI of Chapter 80 of the Public Laws of 1965, entitled "An Act
Approving and Ratifying the Agreement between the Towns of Exeter and West Greenwich, Rhode
Island, with Respect to the formation of a Regional School District," and the several amendments
to the same subsequent thereto, are hereby amended to read as follows:
Section XI. Amendments.
This agreement may be amended from time to time in the manner hereinafter provided, but
no amendment shall be made which shall impair the right of the holders of any bonds or notes or
other evidences of indebtedness of the regional school district then outstanding, or the rights of the
regional school district to procure the means for payment thereof, provided that nothing in this
section shall prevent the admission of a new town or towns to the regional school district and the
reapportionment accordingly of construction costs of the regional school district represented by
bonds or notes of the regional school district then outstanding and of the interest thereon.
A proposal for amendment may be initiated by a majority vote of all the members of the
regional district school committee or by a petition signed by 10% 5% of the registered voters of
any one of the member towns. In the latter case, the petition shall contain at the end thereof, a
certification by the clerk of the canvassing authority of such member town as to the number of
registered voters in said town, according to the most recent voting list, and the number of signatures
on the petition which appear to be the names of registered voters of said town.
In the event that an amendment is initiated by the school district, the regional district school
committee shall appoint a charter review subcommittee to review the charter and recommend
proposal(s) for amendment. The charter review subcommittee shall be comprised of at least two
(2) members of the regional district school committee (one member from Exeter and one member
LC002395 - Page 4 of 6

from West Greenwich), a member of each town council (one member from Exeter and one member
from West Greenwich), and two (2) citizens from each member town. In total, each member town
shall have equal representation on the charter review subcommittee. These defined members are
the only voting members of the charter review subcommittee. Only those proposals that come forth
from the charter review subcommittee, by majority vote of the subcommittee, are to be considered
by the regional district school committee for further action. Any regional district school committee
approved proposal(s) for amendment shall be presented to the clerk of the regional district school
committee, and the clerk or the clerk's designee shall mail or deliver a notice in writing to the town
council of each of the member towns that a proposal(s) to amend this agreement has/have been
received and shall enclose a copy of such proposal(s).
In the event of a proposed amendment by certified petition within a member town, the
proposed amendment must be presented first to both member town councils for review. Before any
further action may take place, both member town councils must approve the proposed amendment
contained within the certified petition. Should either member town council reject the proposed
amendment contained within the certified petition, the proposal is rejected and no further action is
to be taken. Should both member town councils approve the proposed amendment, or a revised
version thereof, a notice in writing must be mailed or delivered from both town councils, including
the proposed amendment, to the clerk of the regional district school committee (without the
signatures in the case of a proposal by petition).
The school committee shall schedule an all-day referendum to vote on the adoption of the
proposed amendment amendment(s). The town councils of the member towns shall thereupon meet
to provide for the all-day referendum in the member towns, with the approval of the proposed
amendment amendment(s) to be by majority vote of the combined total vote of the member towns.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002395
========
LC002395 - Page 5 of 6